Utah statutes.
77-27-7.   Parole or hearing dates -- Interview -- Hearings -- Report of alienists -- Mental competency.

(1)  The Board of Pardons and Parole shall determine within six months after the date of an offender's commitment to the custody of the Department of Corrections, for serving a sentence upon conviction of a felony or class A misdemeanor offense, a date upon which the offender shall be afforded a hearing to establish a date of release or a date for a rehearing, and shall promptly notify the offender of the date.

(2)  Before reaching a final decision to release any offender under this chapter, the chair shall cause the offender to appear before the board, its panel, or any appointed hearing officer, who shall personally interview the offender to consider the offender's fitness for release and verify as far as possible information furnished from other sources.  Any offender may waive a personal appearance before the board.  Any offender outside of the state shall, if ordered by the board, submit to a courtesy hearing to be held by the appropriate authority in the jurisdiction in which the offender is housed in lieu of an appearance before the board.  The offender shall be promptly notified in writing of the board's decision.

(3) (a)  In the case of an offender convicted of violating or attempting to violate any of the provisions of Section 76-5-301.1, Subsection 76-5-302(1)(b)(vi), Section 76-5-402, 76-5-402.1, 76-5-402.2, 76-5-402.3, 76-5-403, 76-5-403.1, 76-5-404, 76-5-404.1,  or 76-5-405, the chair may appoint one or more alienists who shall examine the offender within six months prior to a hearing at which an original parole date is granted on any offense listed in this Subsection (3).

(b)  The alienists shall report in writing the results of the examination to the board prior to the hearing.  The report of the appointed alienists shall specifically address the question of the offender's current mental condition and attitudes as they relate to any danger the offender may pose to children or others if the offender is released on parole.

(4)  The parolee may petition the board for termination of lifetime parole as provided in Section 76-3-202 in the case of a person convicted of a first degree felony violation or convicted of attempting to violate Section 76-5-301.1, Subsection 76-5-302(1)(b)(vi), Section 76-5-402, 76-5-402.1, 76-5-402.2, 76-5-402.3, 76-5-403, 76-5-403.1, 76-5-404.1, or 76-5-405.

(5)  In any case where an offender's mental competency is questioned by the board, the chair may appoint one or more alienists to examine the offender and report in writing to the board, specifically addressing the issue of competency.

(6)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the board shall make rules governing:

(a)  the hearing process;

(b)  alienist examination; and

(c)  parolee petitions for termination of parole.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

